Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2452.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [325F.997] ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE AND DYNAMIC PRICING; PROHIBITION. new text end new text begin (a) For the purposes of this section, "artificial intelligence" means a machine-based system that, for an explicit or implicit objective, infers from the inputs the system receives how to generate outputs, including content, decisions, predictions, or recommendations, that are capable of influencing physical or virtual environments. new text end new text begin (b) A person is prohibited from using artificial intelligence to adjust, fix, or control product prices in real time based on market demands, competitor prices, inventory levels, customer behavior, or other factors a person may use to determine or set prices for a product. new text end new text begin (c) The attorney general may enforce this section under section 8.31. new text end